Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4407.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3002.8 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Oklahoma Department of Human Services to be designated the
"Options Counseling for Long-term Care Revolving Fund". The fund
shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,
and shall consist of all monies received by the Oklahoma Department
of Human Services from state-appropriated funds, federal funds,
donations, grants, and contributions from any public or private
source and designated for the purpose set forth in this section.
All monies accruing to the credit of said fund are hereby
Req. No. 14271 Page 1

appr opriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma
Department of Human Services for the purpose of providing
individuals, their representatives, or both, with long-term care
options consultation by phone or in person. Expenditures from said
fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer
against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-14271 TJ 01/08/26









Req. No. 14271 Page 2